Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-433
Appeal; procedure.

All final determinations, findings, and conclusions of the department under the Uniform Controlled Substances Act shall be final and conclusive decisions of the matters involved, except that any person aggrieved by such decision may appeal the decision, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 93;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 27;

Laws 2001, LB 113, § 15.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.